Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB81.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
charter county government, unified local government, or consolidated local
government; and
(b) "Short-term rental" means any dwelling unit, including a single-family
home, unit in a two (2) family or multifamily dwelling, unit in a
condominium, cooperative, or timeshare, or detached or attached accessory
dwelling unit on the same lot as a residential dwelling, that is rented for
terms of less than thirty (30) days at a time.
(2) Every short-term rental shall comply with all state and local zoning, building
code, and fire safety laws, administrative regulations, and ordinances.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a local government
may enact ordinances regarding short-term rentals that include but are not
limited to the following:
(a) Creating a registry of short-term rentals;
(b) Imposing licensing or inspection fees on short-term rentals;
(c) Restricting the locations or zones in which short-term rentals may be
located or operated;
(d) Prohibiting the use of a property as a short-term rental when that property
has been the subject of ordinance violations or criminal activity has
occurred at the property during a period when it was used as a short-term
rental;
(e) Restricting the total number of short-term rentals within the jurisdiction of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/30/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 889
the local government or the total number of short-term rentals that may be
marketed by an individual or entity;
(f) Restricting the number of short-term rentals within a portion of the
jurisdiction of the local government or the proximity of one (1) short-term
rental to any other short-term rental; and
(g) Requiring that an owner occupy the short-term rental or some portion of
the property during times when it is being used a short-term rental.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/30/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed